Alaska, session 34, SB29.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 08.36.070 is amended to read: 06 Sec. 08.36.070. Duties and [GENERAL] powers of board. (a) The board 07 shall 08 (1) provide for the examination of applicants and the credentialing, 09 registration, and licensure of those applicants it finds qualified; 10 (2) maintain a registry of licensed dentists, licensed dental hygienists, 11 and registered dental assistants who are in good standing; 12 (3) affiliate with the American Association of Dental Boards and pay 13 annual dues to the association; 14 (4) hold hearings and order the disciplinary sanction of a person who 01 violates this chapter, AS 08.32, or a regulation of the board; 02 (5) supply forms for applications, licenses, permits, certificates, 03 registration documents, and other papers and records; 04 (6) enforce the provisions of this chapter and AS 08.32 and adopt or 05 amend the regulations necessary to make the provisions of this chapter and AS 08.32 06 effective; 07 (7) adopt regulations ensuring that renewal of a license, registration, or 08 certificate under this chapter or a license, certificate, or endorsement under AS 08.32 09 is contingent on proof of continued professional competence; the regulations must 10 require that a licensee receive not less than two hours of education in pain 11 management and opioid use and addiction in the two years preceding an application 12 for renewal of a license, unless the licensee has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the 13 board that the licensee does not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement 14 Administration registration number; 15 (8) at least annually, cause to be published on the Internet and in a 16 newspaper of general circulation in each major city in the state a summary of 17 disciplinary actions the board has taken during the preceding calendar year; 18 (9) issue permits or certificates to licensed dentists, licensed dental 19 hygienists, and dental assistants who meet standards determined by the board for 20 specific procedures that require specific education and training; 21 (10) require that a licensed dentist who has a federal Drug 22 Enforcement Administration registration number register with the controlled substance 23 prescription database under AS 17.30.200(n); 24 (11) establish the qualifications and duties of the executive 25 administrator. 26 (b) The board may 27 (1) order a licensed dentist or licensed dental hygienist to submit to a 28 reasonable physical or mental examination if the dentist's or the dental hygienist's 29 physical or mental capacity to practice safely is at issue; 30 (2) authorize a designee of the board or the board's investigator to 31 inspect the practice facilities or patient or professional records of a dentist at 01 reasonable times and in a reasonable manner to monitor compliance with this chapter 02 and with AS 08.32; [AND] 03 (3) delegate the board's powers to act, hear, and decide matters as 04 authorized by AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act); and 05 (4) delegate authority to the executive administrator as necessary 06 to conduct board business. 07 * Sec. 2. AS 08.36 is amended by adding a new section to read: 08 Sec. 08.36.072. Executive administrator of the board. (a) The department, in 09 consultation with the board, shall employ an executive administrator. The executive 10 administrator is the principal executive officer of the board, in the partially exempt 11 service under AS 39.25.120, and entitled to receive a monthly salary equal to a step in 12 Range 23 on the salary schedule set out in AS 39.27.011(a). 13 (b) The executive administrator shall perform duties as prescribed by the 14 board. 15 * Sec. 3. AS 08.54.591 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 16 (c) The department, in consultation with the board, shall employ an executive 17 administrator to perform duties as prescribed by the board. The executive 18 administrator is the principal executive officer of the board. The executive 19 administrator is in the partially exempt service under AS 39.25.120 and is entitled to 20 receive a monthly salary equal to a step in Range 23 on the salary schedule set out in 21 AS 39.27.011(a). 22 * Sec. 4. AS 08.54.600(a) is amended to read: 23 (a) The board shall 24 (1) prepare and grade 25 (A) a qualification examination for a registered guide-outfitter 26 license that requires demonstration that the applicant is qualified generally to 27 provide guided and outfitted hunts and, in particular, possesses knowledge of 28 fishing, hunting, and guiding laws and regulations; and 29 (B) a certification examination for each game management unit 30 in which the registered guide-outfitter intends to provide big game hunting 31 services; the examination must require demonstration that the registered guide- 01 outfitter is qualified to provide guided and outfitted hunts in the game 02 management unit for which the registered guide-outfitter seeks to be certified 03 and, in particular, must require demonstration that the registered guide-outfitter 04 possesses knowledge of the terrain, transportation problems, game, and other 05 characteristics of the game management unit; 06 (2) authorize the issuance of registered guide-outfitter, master guide- 07 outfitter, class-A assistant guide, assistant guide, and transporter licenses after the 08 applicant for the license satisfies the requirements for the license; 09 (3) impose appropriate disciplinary sanctions on a licensee under 10 AS 08.54.600 - 08.54.790; 11 (4) require an applicant for issuance or renewal of any class of guide 12 license or of a transporter license to state in a written and signed document whether 13 the applicant's right to obtain, or exercise the privileges granted by, a hunting, guiding, 14 outfitting, or transportation services license is revoked or suspended in this state or 15 another state or in Canada; 16 (5) regularly disseminate information regarding examinations and 17 other qualifications for all classes of guide licenses to residents of the rural areas of the 18 state; 19 (6) adopt procedural and substantive regulations required by this 20 chapter; 21 (7) provide for administration of examinations for registered guide- 22 outfitters at least twice a year; 23 (8) meet at least twice annually; 24 (9) [REPEALED] 25 (10) coordinate and consult with the Board of Game and the 26 Department of Natural Resources to fulfill the duties of each under AS 16.05.263 and 27 AS 38.05.021; and 28 (11) establish the qualifications and duties of the board's executive 29 administrator employed by the department under AS 08.54.591(c) and delegate 30 authority to the executive administrator as necessary to conduct board business. 31 * Sec. 5. AS 39.25.120(c) is amended to read: 01 (c) The following positions in the state service constitute the partially exempt 02 service: 03 (1) deputy and assistant commissioners of the principal departments of 04 the executive branch, including the assistant adjutant general of the Department of 05 Military and Veterans' Affairs; 06 (2) the directors of the major divisions of the principal departments of 07 the executive branch and the regional directors of the Department of Transportation 08 and Public Facilities; 09 (3) attorney members of the staff of the Department of Law, of the 10 public defender agency, and of the office of public advocacy in the Department of 11 Administration; 12 (4) one private secretary for each head of a principal department in the 13 executive branch; 14 (5) employees of councils, boards, or commissions established by 15 statute in the Office of the Governor or the office of the lieutenant governor, unless a 16 different classification is provided by statute; 17 (6) not more than two special assistants to the commissioner of each of 18 the principal departments of the executive branch, but the number may be increased if 19 the partially exempt service is extended under AS 39.25.130 to include the additional 20 special assistants; 21 (7) the principal executive officer of the following boards, councils, or 22 commissions: 23 (A) Alaska Public Broadcasting Commission; 24 (B) Professional Teaching Practices Commission; 25 (C) Parole Board; 26 (D) Board of Nursing; 27 (E) Real Estate Commission; 28 (F) Alaska Royalty Oil and Gas Development Advisory Board; 29 (G) Alaska State Council on the Arts; 30 (H) Alaska Police Standards Council; 31 (I) Alaska Commission on Aging; 01 (J) Alaska Mental Health Board; 02 (K) State Medical Board; 03 (L) Governor's Council on Disabilities and Special Education; 04 (M) Advisory Board on Alcoholism and Drug Abuse; 05 (N) Statewide Suicide Prevention Council; 06 (O) State Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and 07 Land Surveyors; 08 (P) Alaska Health Care Commission; 09 (Q) Board of Pharmacy; 10 (R) Big Game Commercial Services Board; 11 (S) Board of Dental Examiners; 12 (8) Alaska Pioneers' Home and Alaska Veterans' Home managers; 13 (9) hearing examiners in the Department of Revenue; 14 (10) the comptroller in the division of treasury, Department of 15 Revenue; 16 (11) airport managers in the Department of Transportation and Public 17 Facilities employed at the Anchorage and Fairbanks International Airports; 18 (12) the deputy director of the division of insurance in the Department 19 of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development; 20 (13) the executive director and staff of the Alaska Public Offices 21 Commission; 22 (14) the rehabilitation administrator of the division of workers' 23 compensation; 24 (15) guards employed by the Department of Public Safety for 25 emergencies; 26 (16) marine pilot coordinator of the Board of Marine Pilots; 27 (17) guards employed by the Department of Corrections, other than in 28 state correctional facilities, to carry out the responsibility of the commissioner of 29 corrections under AS 33.30.071(b); 30 (18) hearing officers and administrative law judges of the Regulatory 31 Commission of Alaska; 01 (19) the compact administrator appointed under AS 33.36.130; 02 (20) the chief administrative law judge and administrative law judges 03 of the office of administrative hearings; 04 (21) the executive secretary of the Board of Public Accountancy. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.